Illinois, session 104th, SB152.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Fire Protection Training Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 740/15)  (from Ch. 85, par. 545)7    Sec. 15. Short title. This Act shall be known and may be 8cited as the the "Illinois Fire Protection Training Act".9(Source: P.A. 77-1665.)